Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in  this section, “investor-owned utility” means a public utility,
as defined in ORS 757.005, that provides electric power and is regulated by the Public  Utility
Commission under ORS chapter 757.
(2) An investor-owned utility that  sells more than two million megawatt hours of elec-
tricity in a  calendar year shall report to the Legislative Assembly no later than January 15
of the following  year to inform the Legislative Assembly of activities, including plans or
preparations, that the investor-owned utility has  taken or is taking toward participating in
a regional energy market.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2024 Act applies to calendar years beginning on or after
January 1, 2024.
SECTION 3. Sections 1 and 2 of this 2024 Act are repealed on January 2, 2031.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1581 (SB 1581-A) Page 1
Passed by Senate February 21, 2024
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House March 5, 2024
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1581 (SB 1581-A) Page 2